sk-SK: Typ časti krídla: Duša – nábežná hrana; Duša – stredová vzpera; Rahno; Rukoväť – pevná; Rukoväť – mäkká; Nafukovacia hadica; Leash; Montážna skrutka; Záplata na opravu; Popruh; Ventil; Okenný panel; Iné
nb: Type vingedel: Blære – forkant; Blære – stag; Bom; Håndtak – stivt; Håndtak – mykt; Pumpeslange; Fangrem; Monteringsskrue; Lappesaker; Stropp; Ventil; Vinduspanel; Annet
fr: Type de pièce d’aile: Boudin - bord d’attaque; Vessie - latte; Wishbone; Poignée - rigide; Poignée - souple; Tuyau de gonflage; Leash; Vis de montage; Rustine de réparation; Sangle; Valve; Panneau de fenêtre; Autre
de: Art des Wingfoil-Teils: Bladder – Leading Edge; Bladder – Strut; Boom; Griff – starr; Griff – weich; Aufblasschlauch; Leash; Befestigungsschraube; Reparaturflicken; Gurt; Ventil; Fenster-Panel; Sonstige
it: Tipo di parte dell'ala: Bladder - bordo d'attacco; Bladder - strut centrale; Boma; Maniglia - rigida; Maniglia - morbida; Tubo di gonfiaggio; Leash; Vite di montaggio; Toppa di riparazione; Cinghia; Valvola; Pannello finestra; Altro
zh-CN: 风翼部件类型: 气囊 - 前缘; 气囊 - 支撑杆; 横杆; 把手 - 硬质; 把手 - 软质; 充气软管; 安全绳; 安装螺丝; 修复补丁; 绑带; 气门; 视窗面板; 其他
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος πτερυγίου: Αεροθάλαμος (bladder) - χείλος προσβολής; Αεροθάλαμος (bladder) - δοκός (strut); Μάτσα (boom); Λαβή - άκαμπτη; Λαβή - μαλακή; Σωλήνας φουσκώματος; Leash; Βίδα τοποθέτησης; Επίθεμα επισκευής; Ιμάντας; Βαλβίδα; Πάνελ παραθύρου; Άλλο
hu: Szárnyalkatrész típusa: Belső - belépőél; Belső - dúc; Boom; Fogantyú – merev; Fogantyú – puha; Felfújótömlő; Leash; Rögzítőcsavar; Javítófolt; Pánt; Szelep; Ablakpanel; Egyéb
cs: Typ části křídla: Duše – náběžná hrana; Duše – spíra; Ráhno; Madlo – pevné; Madlo – měkké; Nafukovací hadice; Leash; Montážní šroub; Záplata pro opravu; Popruh; Ventil; Okenní panel; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta dijela krila: Mijeh – napadni rub; Mijeh – ukruta; Bum; Ručka – kruta; Ručka – meka; Crijevo za napuhavanje; Vezica; Vijak za montažu; Zakrpa za popravak; Remen; Ventil; Prozorski panel; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de peça da asa: Câmara de ar - bordo de ataque; Câmara de ar - costela; Retranca; Pega - rígida; Pega - macia; Mangueira de enchimento; Leash; Parafuso de montagem; Remendo de reparação; Alça; Válvula; Painel com janela; Outro
ja: 翼部品タイプ: ブラダー - リーディングエッジ; ブラダー - ストラット; ブーム; ハンドル - リジッド; ハンドル - ソフト; インフレーションホース; リーシュ; マウント用ネジ; 修理用パッチ; ストラップ; バルブ; ウィンドウパネル; その他
da: Komponenttype til wingfoil-vinge: Blære - leading edge; Blære - strut; Bom; Håndtag - stift; Håndtag - blødt; Pumpeslange; Leash; Monteringsskrue; Reparationslap; Strop; Ventil; Vinduespanel; Andet
sv: Typ av vingdel: Blåsa – framkant; Blåsa – strut; Bom; Handtag – fast; Handtag – mjukt; Pumpslang; Leash; Monteringsskruv; Reparationslapp; Rem; Ventil; Fönsterpanel; Övrigt
lt-LT: Sparno dalies tipas: Pūslė – priekinis kraštas; Pūslė – spyris; Gikas; Rankena – kieta; Rankena – minkšta; Pripūtimo žarnelė; Saitas; Tvirtinimo varžtas; Taisymo lopas; Dirželis; Vožtuvas; Lango elementas; Kita
en: Wing part type: Bladder - leading edge; Bladder - strut; Boom; Handle - rigid; Handle - soft; Inflation hose; Leash; Mounting screw; Repair patch; Strap; Valve; Window panel; Other
pt-BR: Asa tipo de peça: Câmara de ar - bordo de ataque; Câmara de ar - costela; Retranca; Alça - rígida; Alça - flexível; Mangueira de inflação; Leash; Parafuso de montagem; Remendo; Cinta; Válvula; Visor; Outro
pl: Typ części skrzydła: Balon - krawędź natarcia; Balon - tuba poprzeczna; Bom; Uchwyt - sztywny; Uchwyt - miękki; Wężyk do pompowania; Leash; Śruba montażowa; Łatka naprawcza; Pasek; Zawór; Panel okienny; Inny
vi: Loại bộ phận cánh: Túi khí - mép trước; Túi khí - thanh chống; Trục vòm; Tay cầm - cứng; Tay cầm - mềm; Vòi bơm hơi; Dây xích; Ốc vít lắp đặt; Miếng vá; Dây đeo; Van; Ô kính; Khác
fi: Siipiosan tyyppi: Sisäkumi – etureuna; Sisäkumi – tuki; Puomi; Kahva – jäykkä; Kahva – pehmeä; Täyttöletku; Karkuremmi; Kiinnitysruuvi; Korjauspaikka; Hihna; Venttiili; Ikkunapaneeli; Muu
tr: Kanat parçası tipi: Bladder - hücum kenarı; Bladder - strut; Bumba; Tutacak - sert; Tutacak - yumuşak; Şişirme hortumu; Leash; Montaj vidası; Onarım yaması; Kayış; Valf; Pencere paneli; Diğer
ru: Тип детали крыла: Баллон передней кромки; Баллон (поперечный); Гик; Ручка (жесткая); Ручка (мягкая); Шланг для накачивания; Лиш; Крепежный винт; Ремкомплект (заплатка); Ремень; Клапан; Оконная панель; Другое
zh-TW: 風翼零件類型: 氣囊 - 前緣; 氣囊 - 支柱; 帆杆; 把手 - 剛性; 把手 - 軟式; 充氣管; 腳繩; 安裝螺絲; 修補貼片; 綁帶; 氣閥; 窗板; 其他
ko: 윙포일 윙 부품 유형: 블래더 - 리딩 엣지; 블래더 - 스트럿; 붐; 핸들 - 리지드; 핸들 - 소프트; 공기 주입 호스; 리시; 장착 나사; 수리 패치; 스트랩; 밸브; 윈도우 패널; 기타
th: ประเภทชิ้นส่วนปีก: บลัดเดอร์ - ขอบนำปีก; บลัดเดอร์ - สตรัท; บูม; แฮนเดิล - แบบแข็ง; แฮนเดิล - แบบอ่อน; สายยางเติมลม; สายโยง; สกรูยึด; แผ่นปะซ่อมแซม; สายรัด; วาล์ว; แผงหน้าต่าง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul piesei de aripă: Cameră de aer - bord de atac; Cameră de aer - strut; Ghiu; Mâner - rigid; Mâner - moale; Furtun de umflare; Leash; Șurub de montare; Petec de reparație; Curea; Supapă; Panou transparent; Altele
nl: Vleugel onderdeel type: Bladder - leading edge; Bladder - strut; Giek; Handgreep - hard; Handgreep - zacht; Pompslang; Leash; Bevestigingsschroef; Reparatiepatch; Strap; Ventiel; Vensterpaneel; Overige
sl-SI: Vrsta dela za krilo: Mehur - sprednji rob; Mehur - prečka; Lok (boom); Ročaj - trd; Ročaj - mehek; Cev za napihovanje; Varnostna vrvica (leash); Pritrdilni vijak; Zaplate za popravilo; Trak; Ventil; Okenska plošča; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип част на крилото: Мехур - преден ръб; Мехур - рейка; Гик; Дръжка - твърда; Дръжка - мека; Маркуч за напомпване; Лийш; Монтажен винт; Ремонтна лепенка; Каишка; Клапан; Прозоречен панел; Друго
es: Tipo de pieza del ala: Cámara de aire: borde de ataque; Cámara de aire: costilla; Botavara; Asa: rígida; Asa: suave; Manguera de inflado; Correa (leash); Tornillo de montaje; Parche de reparación; Correa; Válvula; Panel de ventana; Otro